Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1368
Disciplinary actions; fine; disposition.

(1) The department may impose any one or more of the following types of disciplinary action against a crematory authority licensed under the Cremation of Human Remains Act:

(a) A fine not to exceed five hundred dollars per violation;

(b) A limitation on the license and upon the right of the crematory authority to operate a crematory to the extent, scope, or type of operation, for such time, and under such conditions as the director finds necessary and proper;

(c) Placement of the license on probation for a period not to exceed two years during which the crematory may continue to operate under terms and conditions fixed by the order of probation;

(d) Suspension of the license for a period not to exceed two years during which the crematory may not operate; and

(e) Revocation and permanent termination of the license.

(2) Any fine imposed and unpaid under the Cremation of Human Remains Act shall constitute a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected in the manner of a lien foreclosure or sued for and recovered in any proper form of action in the name of the State of Nebraska in the district court of the county in which the crematory is located. The department shall remit fines to the State Treasurer, within thirty days after receipt, for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 14;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 472.